src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-cuaecc_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čuäcc e-stem sipuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Nom: čuäcc
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Gen: čuäʒʒ
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Acc: čuäʒʒ
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Ill: čuåcˈcu
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Loc: čuäʒʒast
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Com: čuäʒʒain
     čuäcc+N+Ess: čuäccan
     čuäcc+N+Par: čuäccad
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Abe: [čuäʒʒtaa, čuäʒʒtää]
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Nom: čuäʒʒ
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Gen: čuäʒʒai
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Acc: čuäʒʒaid
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Ill: čuäʒʒaid
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Loc: čuäʒʒain
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Com: čuäʒʒaivuiʹm
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Abe: [čuäʒʒaitaa, čuäʒʒaitää]
